Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.501

Payment of fair value—Requirements for compliance.

(1) Within thirty days of the later of the date the proposed merger becomes effective, or the payment demand is received, the limited liability company must pay each dissenter who complied with RCW 25.15.491 the amount the limited liability company estimates to be the fair value of the dissenting member's interest in the limited liability company, plus accrued interest.

(2) The payment must be accompanied by:

(a) Copies of the financial statements for the limited liability company for its most recent fiscal year maintained as required by RCW 25.15.136;

(b) An explanation of how the limited liability company estimated the fair value of the member's interest in the limited liability company;

(c) An explanation of how the accrued interest was calculated;

(d) A statement of the dissenter's right to demand payment; and

(e) A copy of this article.

[ 2015 c 188 s 96.]